District of Columbia statutes.
15-355

Fees.

Any person filing a foreign judgment shall pay to the Clerk the fee established by the Superior Court. Fees for docketing, transcription, or other enforcement proceedings shall be as provided for judgments of the Superior Court.

Oct. 2, 1990, D.C. Law 8-173, § 2(b), 37 DCR 5005
1981 Ed., § 15-355.
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 5 of the Uniform Enforcement of Foreign Judgments Act (1964).